Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-354
Public lands; grant of right-of-way.

The right-of-way is hereby given, dedicated and set apart, to locate, construct and maintain such works over and through any of the lands which are now or may be the property of the state.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 23, p. 629;

R.S.1913, § 1849;

C.S.1922, § 1796;

C.S.1929, § 31-453;

R.S.1943, § 31-354.